Connecticut, session 2026, SB00174.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
five hundred thousand dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by
the Department of Energy and Environmental Protection for the
purpose of a providing a grant-in-aid to the town of Ledyard for a
planning grant to expand and install sewer lines on Connecticut Route
12 in said town.